test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-baardne_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bárdne: # N_EVEN_NOCG (no grade alternations)
    bárdne+N+Sg+Nom: bárdne
    bárdne+N+Sg+Gen: bárdne
    bárdne+N+Sg+Acc: bárdnev
    bárdne+N+Sg+Ill: bárdnáj
    bárdne+N+Sg+Ine: bárdnen
    bárdne+N+Sg+Ela: [bárdnest, bárdnes]
    bárdne+N+Sg+Com: [bärdnijn, bärdnijna]
    bárdne+N+Pl+Nom: bárdne
    bárdne+N+Pl+Gen: bärdnij
    bárdne+N+Pl+Acc: bärdnijd
    bárdne+N+Pl+Ill: bärdnijda
    bárdne+N+Pl+Ine: bärdnijn
    bárdne+N+Pl+Ela: [bärdnijst, bärdnijs]
    bárdne+N+Pl+Com: [bärdnij, bärdnijgum]
    bárdne+N+Ess: bárdnen
